Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.231

Temporary permits.

The department is authorized to grant and issue temporary permits in lieu of certificates of competency whenever an electrician coming into the state of Washington from another state requests the department for a temporary permit to engage in the electrical construction trade as an electrician during the period of time between filing of an application for a certificate as provided in RCW 19.28.181 and the date the results of taking the examination provided for in RCW 19.28.201 are furnished to the applicant. The temporary permit may include a photograph of the holder. The department is authorized to enter into reciprocal agreements with other states providing for the acceptance of such states' journey level and specialty electrician certificate of competency or its equivalent when such states requirements are equal to the standards set by this chapter. No temporary permit shall be issued to:

(1) Any person who has failed to pass the examination for a certificate of competency, except that any person who has failed the examination for competency under this section shall be entitled to continue to work under a temporary permit for ninety days if the person is enrolled in a journey level electrician refresher course and shows evidence to the department that he or she has not missed any classes. The person, after completing the journey level electrician refresher course, shall be eligible to retake the examination for competency at the next scheduled time.

(2) Any applicant under this section who has not furnished the department with such evidence required under RCW 19.28.181.

(3) Any apprentice electrician.

[ 2013 c 23 s 35; 2009 c 36 s 9; 2001 c 211 s 16; 1986 c 156 s 15; 1983 c 206 s 17; 1980 c 30 s 8. Formerly RCW 19.28.570.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2009 c 36: See note following RCW 18.106.020.